New Jersey, session 222, S1823.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 19 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-28) is amended to read as follows: 19.  Preparation; contents; modification. a.     The planning board may prepare and, after public hearing, adopt or amend a master plan or component parts thereof, to guide the use of lands within the municipality in a manner which protects public health and safety and promotes the general welfare. b.    The master plan shall generally comprise a report or statement and land use and development proposals, with maps, diagrams and text, presenting, at least the following elements (1) [and] , (2), and (3) and, where appropriate, the following elements [(3)] (4) through (17): (1)   A statement of objectives, principles, assumptions, policies and standards upon which the constituent proposals for the physical, economic and social development of the municipality are based; (2)   A land use plan element (a)   taking into account and stating [its] the land use plan elements relationship to the statement provided for in paragraph (1) hereof and the land use plan elements relationship, and how it is designed to effectuate, the housing plan element provided for in paragraph (3) of this subsection, and the housing plan elements relationship to the other master plan elements provided for in paragraphs [(3)] (4) through (17) hereof that may be included in the master plan, and natural conditions, including, but not necessarily limited to, topography, soil conditions, water supply, drainage, flood plain areas, marshes, and woodlands; (b)   showing the existing and proposed location, extent and intensity of development and redevelopment of land to be used in the future for varying types of residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, open space, educational and other public and private purposes or combination of purposes including any provisions for cluster development; and stating the relationship thereof to the existing and any proposed zone plan and zoning ordinance; (c)   showing the existing and proposed location of any airports and the boundaries of any airport safety zones delineated pursuant to the "Air Safety and Zoning Act of 1983," P.L.1983, c.260 (C.6:1-80 et al.); (d)   including a statement of the standards of population density and development intensity recommended for the municipality; (e)   showing the existing and proposed location of military facilities and incorporating strategies to minimize undue encroachment upon, and conflicts with, military facilities, including but not limited to: limiting heights of buildings and structures nearby flight paths or sight lines of aircraft; buffering residential areas from noise associated with a military facility; and allowing for the potential expansion of military facilities; (f)   including, for any land use plan element adopted after the effective date of P.L.2017, c.275, a statement of strategy concerning: (i)    smart growth which, in part, shall consider potential locations for the installation of electric vehicle charging stations, (ii)   storm resiliency with respect to energy supply, flood-prone areas, and environmental infrastructure, and (iii)  environmental sustainability; (g)   showing the existing and proposed location of public electric vehicle charging infrastructure; [and] (h)   including, for any land use plan element adopted after the effective date of P.L.2021, c.6, a climate change-related hazard vulnerability assessment which shall (i) analyze current and future threats to, and vulnerabilities of, the municipality associated with climate change-related natural hazards, including, but not limited to increased temperatures, drought, flooding, hurricanes, and sea-level rise; (ii) include a build-out analysis of future residential, commercial, industrial, and other development in the municipality, and an assessment of the threats and vulnerabilities identified in subsubparagraph (i) of this subparagraph related to that development; (iii) identify critical facilities, utilities, roadways, and other infrastructure that is necessary for evacuation purposes and for sustaining quality of life during a natural disaster, to be maintained at all times in an operational state; (iv) analyze the potential impact of natural hazards on relevant components and elements of the master plan; (v) provide strategies and design standards that may be implemented to reduce or avoid risks associated with natural hazards; (vi) include a specific policy statement on the consistency, coordination, and integration of the climate-change related hazard vulnerability assessment with any existing or proposed natural hazard mitigation plan, floodplain management plan, comprehensive emergency management plan, emergency response plan, post-disaster recovery plan, or capital improvement plan; and (vii) rely on the most recent natural hazard projections and best available science provided by the New Jersey Department of Environmental Protection; and (i)  showing areas designated in need of redevelopment or rehabilitation, pursuant to the "Local Redevelopment and Housing Law", P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-1 et seq.), redevelopment plans adopted for those areas, and the status of redevelopment projects in those areas; (3)   A housing plan element [pursuant to section 10 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-310)] evaluating the need for, and establishing a plan to provide housing in the municipality, including, but not limited to, residential standards and proposals for the construction and improvement of housing [;] , including affordable housing.  A housing plan element shall include: (a)   An evaluation of the existing inventory, variety, and geographic distribution of housing in the municipality, including an inventory of the municipality's housing stock by age, condition, purchase or rental value, occupancy characteristics, and type, including the number of units affordable to low- and moderate-income households and substandard housing capable of being rehabilitated.  In conducting this inventory, the municipality shall have access, on a confidential basis for the sole purpose of conducting the inventory, to all necessary property tax assessment records and information in the assessor's office, including but not limited to, the property record cards; (b)   A projection of the municipality's housing stock for the next 10 years, including the probable future construction of low- and moderate-income housing, which shall take into account, but shall not be limited to, construction permits issued, approvals of applications for residential development, anticipated development of lands zoned for residential development, areas designated in need of redevelopment or rehabilitation that are planned for residential development, or the redevelopment or adaptive reuse of nonresidential land uses into housing, which analysis shall include where relevant mixed-use development with a residential component will be located; (c)   An analysis of the existing and projected population of the municipality, including an analysis of the municipality's demographic and household characteristics, which shall include but shall not be limited to, household size, income level, and age, and shall also consider relevant Statewide and regional demographic and socioeconomic data and projections identified in State, regional, and county plans, including the State Development and Redevelopment Plan adopted pursuant to the "State Planning Act," sections 1 through 12 of P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et seq.); (d)   An analysis of the amount and types of housing required to satisfy the needs of the existing and projected population of the municipality, with the intent of aligning the housing plan element with the municipalitys projected housing needs, and the municipalitys fair share of the regional need for low- and moderate-income housing pursuant to the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.).  This analysis shall include an evaluation of all relevant housing types, including market-rate housing; low- and moderate-income housing; single-family residential dwellings, multi-family residential dwellings, including two-, three- and four-family dwellings; accessory dwelling units; senior and age-restricted housing; special needs housing and alternative living arrangements; multi-generational housing; rental and for-sale units; and other housing types as may be relevant; (e)   An evaluation of local and regional economic drivers that affect housing supply in the municipality; geospatial, physical, and environmental factors that impact the production of housing; and appropriate locations for the development of housing in the municipality; (f)   A determination of the municipality's present and prospective fair share for low- and moderate-income housing and of the municipalitys capacity to accommodate its present and prospective housing needs, including its fair share for low- and moderate-income housing, as established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1); (g)   Consideration and identification of lands most appropriate for the development of housing, including low- and moderate-income housing, or the redevelopment of existing developed lands, including nonresidential land uses, into housing and the inclusion of these areas in the land use plan element of the master plan, which analysis shall include consideration of lands owned by developers who have expressed a commitment to provide low- and moderate-income housing; (h)   An analysis of the existing and probable future employment characteristics of the municipality; (i)    An analysis of the geospatial relationship of housing to existing and planned transit, community facilities, shopping, services, and employment, and the transportation options available from existing and planned housing to these facilities, services, and employment, including non-vehicular pedestrian circulation and transit opportunities; (j)    An analysis of the extent to which municipal ordinances and other local factors advance or detract from the goal of preserving multigenerational family continuity as expressed in the recommendations of the Multigenerational Family Housing Continuity Commission, adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection f. of section 1 of P.L.2021, c.273 (C.52:27D-329.20); (k)   For a municipality located within the jurisdiction of the Highlands Water Protection and Planning Council, established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-4), an analysis of compliance of the housing plan element with the Highlands Regional Master Plan of lands in the Highlands Preservation Area, and lands in the Highlands Planning Area for Highlands-conforming municipalities.  This analysis shall include consideration of the municipality's most recent Highlands Municipal Build Out Report, consideration of opportunities and lands appropriate for the development of housing or the redevelopment of existing developed lands, including nonresidential land uses, into housing, including inclusionary or 100 percent affordable housing, or both, and opportunities for housing, including 100 percent affordable housing, in both the Highlands Planning Area and Highlands Preservation Area that are consistent with the Highlands regional master plan; (l)    An analysis of the relationship and consistency of the housing plan element with the other components and elements of the master plan, including but not limited to, the land use plan element and climate change-related hazard vulnerability assessment, for the purpose of coordinating the municipalitys housing plan with the other planning goals and objectives of the municipality; (m)  An evaluation of the relationship of the housing plan element to the State Development and Redevelopment Plan, adopted pursuant to the "State Planning Act," sections 1 through 12 of P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et seq.) and to other relevant Statewide planning goals and objectives, including housing supply and diversity; climate change and resiliency; transit-oriented development; redevelopment and community revitalization; economic development; infrastructure, including water, wastewater, and Stormwater; which evaluation shall include an analysis of how the housing plan element is aligned and generally consistent with these Statewide planning goals and objectives. (4)   A circulation plan element showing the location and types of facilities for all modes of transportation required for the efficient movement of people and goods into, about, and through the municipality, taking into account the functional highway classification system of the Federal Highway Administration, the types, locations, conditions and availability of existing and proposed transportation facilities, including air, water, road and rail, and identifying existing and proposed locations for public electric vehicle charging infrastructure; (5)   A utility service plan element analyzing the need for and showing the future general location of water supply and distribution facilities, drainage and flood control facilities, sewerage and waste treatment, solid waste disposal and provision for other related utilities, and including any storm water management plan required pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1981, c.32 (C.40:55D-93 et al.).  If a municipality prepares a utility service plan element as a condition for adopting a development transfer ordinance pursuant to subsection c. of section 4 of P.L.2004, c.2 (C.40:55D-140), the plan element shall address the provision of utilities in the receiving zone as provided thereunder; (6)   A community facilities plan element showing the existing and proposed location and type of educational or cultural facilities, historic sites, libraries, hospitals, firehouses, police stations and other related facilities, including their relation to the surrounding areas; (7)   A recreation plan element showing a comprehensive system of areas and public sites for recreation; (8)   A conservation plan element providing for the preservation, conservation, and utilization of natural resources, including, to the extent appropriate, energy, open space, water supply, forests, soil, marshes, wetlands, harbors, rivers and other waters, fisheries, endangered or threatened species wildlife and other resources, and which systemically analyzes the impact of each other component and element of the master plan on the present and future preservation, conservation and utilization of those resources; (9)   An economic plan element considering all aspects of economic development and sustained economic vitality, including (a) a comparison of the types of employment expected to be provided by the economic development to be promoted with the characteristics of the labor pool resident in the municipality and nearby areas and (b) an analysis of the stability and diversity of the economic development to be promoted; (10) An historic preservation plan element: (a) indicating the location and significance of historic sites and historic districts; (b) identifying the standards used to assess worthiness for historic site or district identification; and (c) analyzing the impact of each component and element of the master plan on the preservation of historic sites and districts; (11) Appendices or separate reports containing the technical foundation for the master plan and its constituent elements; (12) A recycling plan element which incorporates the State Recycling Plan goals, including provisions for the collection, disposition and recycling of recyclable materials designated in the municipal recycling ordinance, and for the collection, disposition and recycling of recyclable materials within any development proposal for the construction of 50 or more units of single-family residential housing or 25 or more units of multi-family residential housing and any commercial or industrial development proposal for the utilization of 1,000 square feet or more of land; (13) A farmland preservation plan element, which shall include: an inventory of farm properties and a map illustrating significant areas of agricultural land; a statement showing that municipal ordinances support and promote agriculture as a business; and a plan for preserving as much farmland as possible in the short term by leveraging moneys made available by P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et al.) through a variety of mechanisms including, but not limited to, utilizing option agreements, installment purchases, and encouraging donations of permanent development easements; (14) A development transfer plan element which sets forth the public purposes, the locations of sending and receiving zones and the technical details of a development transfer program based on the provisions of section 5 of P.L.2004, c.2 (C.40:55D-141); (15) An educational facilities plan element which incorporates the purposes and goals of the "long-range facilities plan" required to be submitted to the Commissioner of Education by a school district pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-4); (16) A green buildings and environmental sustainability plan element, which shall provide for, encourage, and promote the efficient use of natural resources and the installation and usage of renewable energy systems; consider, encourage and promote the development of public electric vehicle charging infrastructure in locations appropriate for their development, including but not limited to, commercial districts, areas proximate to public transportation and transit facilities and transportation corridors, and public rest stops; consider the impact of buildings on the local, regional and global environment; allow ecosystems to function naturally; conserve and reuse water; treat storm water on-site; and optimize climatic conditions through site orientation and design; and (17) A public access plan element that provides for, encourages, and promotes permanently protected public access to all tidal waters and adjacent shorelines consistent with the public trust doctrine, and which shall include a map and inventory of public access points, public facilities that support access, parking, boat ramps, and marinas; an assessment of the need for additional public access; a statement of goals and administrative mechanisms to ensure that access will be permanently protected; and a strategy that describes the forms of access to satisfy the need for such access with an implementation schedule and tools for implementation. c.     The master plan and its plan elements may be divided into subplans and subplan elements projected according to periods of time or staging sequences. d.    The master plan shall include a specific policy statement indicating the relationship of the proposed development of the municipality, as developed in the master plan to (1) the master plans of contiguous municipalities, (2) the master plan of the county in which the municipality is located, (3) the State Development and Redevelopment Plan adopted pursuant to the "State Planning Act," sections 1 through 12 of P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et seq.) and (4) the district solid waste management plan required pursuant to the provisions of the "Solid Waste Management Act," P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-1 et seq.) of the county in which the municipality is located. In the case of a municipality situated within the Highlands Region, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), the master plan shall include a specific policy statement indicating the relationship of the proposed development of the municipality, as developed in the master plan, to the Highlands regional master plan adopted pursuant to section 8 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-8). (cf: P.L.2021, c.6, s.1) 2.    Section 4 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-304) is amended to read as follows: 4.  As used in P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.): a.     "Council" means the Council on Affordable Housing established in P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.), abolished pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1). b.    "Housing region" means a geographic area established pursuant to subsection b. of section 6 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.2). c.     "Low-income housing" means housing affordable according to federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to 50 percent or less of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located. d.    "Moderate-income housing" means housing affordable according to federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to more than 50 percent but less than 80 percent of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located. e.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2024, c.2) f.     "Inclusionary development" means a residential housing development in which a substantial percentage of the housing units are provided for a reasonable income range of low- and moderate-income households. g.    "Conversion" means the conversion of existing commercial, industrial, or residential structures for low- and moderate-income housing purposes where a substantial percentage of the housing units are provided for a reasonable income range of low- and moderate-income households. h.    "Development" means any development for which permission may be required pursuant to the "Municipal Land Use Law," P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.). i.     "Agency" means the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency established by P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.). j.     "Prospective need" means a projection of housing needs based on development and growth which is reasonably likely to occur in a region or a municipality, as the case may be, as a result of actual determination of public and private entities.  Prospective need shall be determined by the methodology set forth pursuant to sections 6 and 7 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.2 and C.52:27D-304.3) for the fourth round and all future rounds of housing obligations. k.    "Person with a disability" means a person with a physical disability, infirmity, malformation, or disfigurement which is caused by bodily injury, birth defect, aging, or illness including epilepsy and other seizure disorders, and which shall include, but not be limited to, any degree of paralysis, amputation, lack of physical coordination, blindness or visual impairment, deafness or hearing impairment, the inability to speak or a speech impairment, or physical reliance on a service animal, wheelchair, or other remedial appliance or device. l.     "Adaptable" means constructed in compliance with the technical design standards of the barrier free subcode adopted by the Commissioner of Community Affairs pursuant to the "State Uniform Construction Code Act," P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-119 et seq.) and in accordance with the provisions of section 5 of P.L.2005, c.350 (C.52:27D-123.15). m.   "Very low-income housing" means housing affordable according to federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to 30 percent or less of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located. n.    "Accessory dwelling unit" means a residential dwelling unit that provides complete independent living facilities with a private entrance for one or more persons, consisting of provisions for living, sleeping, eating, sanitation, and cooking, including a stove and refrigerator, and is located within a proposed or existing primary dwelling, within an existing or proposed structure that is accessory to a dwelling on the same lot, constructed in whole or part as an extension to a proposed or existing primary dwelling, or constructed as a separate detached structure on the same lot as the existing or proposed primary dwelling. o.    "Builder's remedy" means court-imposed, site-specific relief for a litigant who seeks to build affordable housing for which the court requires a municipality to utilize zoning techniques, such as mandatory set-asides or density bonuses, including techniques which provide for the economic viability of a residential development by including housing that is not for low- and moderate-income households. p.    "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Community Affairs. q.    "Compliance certification" means the certification obtained by a municipality pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1), that protects the municipality from exclusionary zoning litigation during the current round of present and prospective need and through July 1 of the year the next round begins, which is also known as a "judgment of compliance" or "judgment of repose."  The term "compliance certification" shall include a judgment of repose granted in an action filed pursuant to section 13 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-313). r.     "County-level housing judge" means a judge appointed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-313.2), to resolve disputes over the compliance of municipal fair share affordable housing obligations and municipal fair share plans and housing elements, with the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.). s.     "Deficient housing unit" means housing that: (1) is over fifty years old and overcrowded; (2) lacks complete plumbing; or (3) lacks complete kitchen facilities. t.     "Department" means the Department of Community Affairs. u.    "Exclusionary zoning litigation" means litigation to challenge the fair share plan, housing element, or ordinances or resolutions implementing the fair share plan or housing element of a municipality based on alleged noncompliance with the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.) or the Mount Laurel doctrine, which litigation shall include, but shall not be limited to, litigation seeking a builder's remedy. v.    "Fair share plan" means the plan or proposal that is in a form which may readily be adopted, with accompanying ordinances and resolutions, pursuant to subsection f. of section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1), by which a municipality proposes to satisfy its obligation to create a realistic opportunity to meet its fair share of low- and moderate-income housing needs of its region and which details the affirmative measures the municipality proposes to undertake to achieve its fair share of low- and moderate-income housing, as provided in the municipal housing element, and addresses the development regulations necessary to implement the housing element, including, but not limited to, inclusionary requirements and development fees, and the elimination of unnecessary housing cost-generating features from the municipal land use ordinances and regulations. w.   "Highlands-conforming municipality" means a municipality that has adopted a land development ordinance implementing the municipality's plan conformance petition and which land development ordinance has been certified by the Highlands Water Protection and Planning Council as consistent with the "Highlands Water Protection and Planning Act," P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et seq.), the Highlands regional master plan, and the municipality's plan conformance approval.  The term "land development ordinance" shall be inclusive of any amendment to the municipality's land development ordinances that is adopted to further the municipality's petition of plan conformance. x.    "Housing element" means that portion of a municipality's master plan consisting of reports, statements, proposals, maps, diagrams, and text designed to evaluate the need for, and establish a plan to provide housing in the municipality, including but not limited to, residential standards and proposals for the construction and improvement of housing in the municipality, including low- and moderate-income housing that is required to meet the municipality's fair share of its region's present and prospective housing needs [, particularly with regard to low- and moderate-income housing] , and which shall contain the municipal present and prospective obligation for affordable housing, determined pursuant to [subsection f. of section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1)] paragraph (3) of subsection b. of section 19 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-28). y.    "Program" means the Affordable Housing Dispute Resolution Program, established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-313.2). z.     "State Development and Redevelopment Plan" or "State Plan" means the plan prepared pursuant to sections 1 through 12 of the "State Planning Act," P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et al.), designed to represent a balance of development and conservation objectives best suited to meet the needs of the State, and for the purpose of coordinating planning activities and establishing Statewide planning objectives in the areas of land use, housing, economic development, transportation, natural resource conservation, agriculture and farmland retention, recreation, urban and suburban redevelopment, historic preservation, public facilities and services, and intergovernmental coordination pursuant to subsection f. of section 5 of P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-200). aa.   "Transitional housing" means temporary housing that: includes, but is not limited to, single-room occupancy housing or shared living and supportive living arrangements; provides access to on-site or off-site supportive services for very low-income households who have recently been homeless or lack stable housing; is licensed by the department; and allows households to remain for a minimum of six months. (cf: P.L.2024, c.2, s.2) 3.    Section 10 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-310) is amended to read as follows: 10.  A municipality's housing plan element, prepared in accordance with section 19 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-28), shall, consistent with the requirements set forth pursuant to the "Municipal Land Use Law," P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.), be designed to achieve the goal of access to affordable housing to meet present and prospective housing needs, with particular attention to low- and moderate-income housing [, and shall contain at least:] . a.     [An inventory of the municipality's housing stock by age, condition, purchase or rental value, occupancy characteristics, and type, including the number of units affordable to  low- and moderate-income households and substandard housing capable of being rehabilitated, and in conducting this inventory the municipality shall have access, on a confidential basis for the sole purpose of conducting the inventory, to all necessary property tax assessment records and information in the assessor's office, including but not limited to the property record cards;] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) b.    [A projection of the municipality's housing stock, including the probable future construction of low- and moderate-income housing, for the next ten years, taking into account, but not necessarily limited to, construction permits issued, approvals of applications for development and probable residential development of lands;] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) c.     [An analysis of the municipality's demographic characteristics, including but not necessarily limited to, household size, income level and age;] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) d.    [An analysis of the existing and probable future employment characteristics of the municipality;] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) e.  [A determination of the municipality's present and prospective fair share for low- and moderate-income housing and its capacity to accommodate its present and prospective housing needs, including its fair share for low- and moderate-income housing, as established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1);] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) f.     [A consideration of the lands that are most appropriate for construction of low- and moderate-income housing and of the existing structures most appropriate for conversion to, or rehabilitation for, low- and moderate-income housing, including a consideration of lands of developers who have expressed a commitment to provide low- and moderate-income housing;] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) g.    [An analysis of the extent to which municipal ordinances and other local factors advance or detract from the goal of preserving multigenerational family continuity as expressed in the recommendations of the Multigenerational Family Housing Continuity Commission, adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection f. of section 1 of P.L.2021, c.273 (C.52:27D-329.20);] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) h.  [For a municipality located within the jurisdiction of the Highlands Water Protection and Planning Council, established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-4), an analysis of compliance of the housing element with the Highlands Regional Master Plan of lands in the Highlands Preservation Area, and lands in the Highlands Planning Area for Highlands-conforming municipalities.  This analysis shall include consideration of the municipality's most recent Highlands Municipal Build Out Report, consideration of opportunities for redevelopment of existing developed lands into inclusionary or 100 percent affordable housing, or both, and opportunities for 100 percent affordable housing in both the Highlands Planning Area and Highlands Preservation Area that are consistent with the Highlands regional master plan; and] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) i.  [An analysis of consistency with the State Development and Redevelopment Plan, including water, wastewater, stormwater, and multi-modal transportation based on guidance and technical assistance from the State Planning Commission.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (cf: P.L.2024, c.2, s.22) 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.